Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4507
Termination
of voluntary services and support agreement; notice; appeal; procedure; department; duties.

(1) A young adult may choose to terminate the voluntary services
and support agreement and stop receiving services and support under the bridge to independence program
at any time. If a young adult chooses to terminate the voluntary services
and support agreement, the department shall provide the young adult with a
clear and developmentally appropriate written notice informing the young adult
of the potential negative effects of terminating the voluntary services and
support agreement early, the option to reenter the bridge to independence program at any time before
attaining twenty-one years of age, the
procedures for reentering the bridge
to independence program,
and information about and contact information for community resources that
may benefit the young adult, specifically including information regarding
state programs established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 677.

(2) If the department determines that the young adult is
no longer eligible for the
bridge to independence program under section 43-4504, the department
may terminate the voluntary services and support agreement and stop providing
services and support to the young adult. Academic breaks in postsecondary
education attendance, such as semester and seasonal breaks, and other transitions
between eligibility requirements under section 43-4504, including education
and employment transitions of no longer than thirty days, shall not be a basis
for termination. Even if a young adult's voluntary services and support agreement
has been previously terminated by either the department or the young adult,
the young adult may come back into the bridge
to independence program by entering into another voluntary services
and support agreement at any time, so long as he or she is eligible under
section 43-4504. At least thirty days prior to the termination of the voluntary
services and support agreement, the department shall provide a clear and developmentally
appropriate written notice to the young adult informing the young adult of
the termination of the voluntary services and support agreement and a clear
and developmentally appropriate explanation of the basis for the termination.
The written termination notice shall also provide information about the process
for appealing the termination, information about the option to enter into
another voluntary services and support agreement once the young adult reestablishes
eligibility under section 43-4504, and information about and contact information
for community resources that may benefit the young adult, specifically including
information regarding state programs established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 677. In addition, the independence coordinator
shall make efforts to meet with the young adult in person to explain the information
in the written termination notice and to assist the young adult in reestablishing
eligibility if the young adult wishes to continue participating in the program. The
young adult may appeal the termination of the voluntary services and support
agreement and any other actions
or inactions by the department administratively, as allowed under the Administrative
Procedure Act.

(3) If the
young adult remains in the bridge to independence program until attaining
twenty-one years of age, the department shall provide the young adult with
a clear and developmentally appropriate written notice informing the young
adult of the termination of the voluntary services and support agreement and
information about and contact information for community resources that may
benefit the young adult, specifically including information regarding state
programs established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 677.

Laws 2013, LB216, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 36.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.